District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05f

Other sanctions.

In addition to, or in lieu of, a civil or criminal penalty or fee:

(1)

The Mayor may modify, suspend, revoke, or deny a permit or certification issued by the District for failure to comply with this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, after notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to § 8-101.05h; and

(2)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may commence appropriate civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any other court of competent jurisdiction for damages, cost recovery, reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, and injunctive or other appropriate relief to enforce compliance with this part or the regulations adopted pursuant to this part.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5f
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767